District of Columbia statutes.
38-822.05

Public disclosure.

(a)

Food service providers shall provide the following information to public schools, public charter schools, and participating private schools:

(1)

The menu for each breakfast and lunch meal served;

(2)

The nutritional content of each menu item;

(3)

The ingredients for each menu item if requested by parents and legal guardians; and

(4)

The location where fruits and vegetables served in schools are grown and processed and whether growers are engaged in sustainable agriculture practices.

(b)

(1)

Public schools, public charter schools, and participating private schools shall provide the information provided to them under subsection (a) of this section:

(A)

In the school’s office;

(B)

Online, if the school has a website; and

(C)

To parents and legal guardians upon request

(2)

Public schools, public charter schools, and participating private schools shall inform families that vegetarian food options and milk alternatives are available upon request.

(c)

This section shall apply as of January 1, 2012.

History

July 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-209, § 205, 57 DCR 4779
Oct. 20, 2011, D.C. Law 19-37, § 2(g), 58 DCR 6841
Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 4062(e), 59 DCR 8025

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-821.02 and § 38-826.02.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 19-37, in subsec. (a), substituted “public schools, public charter schools, and participating private schools” for “public schools, public charter schools, and participating private schools”; in subsecs. (b)(1) and (2), substituted “Public schools, public charter schools, and participating private schools” for “Public schools, public charter schools, and participating private schools”; and added subsec. (c).
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 added “if requested by parents and legal guardians” in (a)(3); substituted “shall provide” for “shall post” in the introductory language of (b)(1); added the comma following “Online” in (b)(1)(B); added (b)(1)(C); and made related changes.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(g) of Healthy Schools Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-143, August 9, 2011, 58 DCR 6814).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4062(e) of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-383, June 19, 2012, 59 DCR 7764).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4062(e) of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).

Editor's Notes

Section 4063 of D.C. Law 19-168 provided that § 4062 of the act shall apply as of June 20, 2012.